Hawaii statutes.
[§342F-10] Citation. Any person who
commits a violation of the noise control rules adopted by the department
pursuant to this chapter may be issued a summons or citation for such violation
by any person authorized to enforce such rules, hereinafter referred to as
enforcement officer. The summons or citation shall be printed in the form
hereinafter described, warning such person to appear and answer to the charge
against the person at a certain place and at a time within seven days after the
issuance of such summons or citation.

The summons or citation shall be designed to
provide for all necessary information. The form and content of such summons or
citation shall be adopted or prescribed by the district environmental courts.

The original of a summons or citation shall be
given to the purported violator and the other copy or copies distributed in the
manner prescribed by the district environmental courts; provided that the
district environmental courts may prescribe alternative methods of distribution
of the original and any other copies.

Summonses and citations shall be consecutively
numbered and the carbon copy or copies of each shall bear the same number.

In the event any person fails to comply with a
summons or citation issued to such person, the enforcement officer shall cause
a complaint to be entered against such person and secure the issuance of a
warrant for the person’s arrest. Failure to comply with a summons or citation
is a misdemeanor. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §3; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next